Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-21,297
Act, how cited.

Sections 25-21,297 to 25-21,301 shall be known and may be cited as the Human Trafficking Victims Civil Remedy Act.

Laws 2015, LB294, § 1.